District of Columbia statutes.
4-635

Program implementation.

(a)

The Mayor shall make the Program available to eligible individuals by January 1, 2010.

(b)

To meet the deadline set forth in subsection (a) of this section, the Mayor is authorized to enter into a contract with one or more health insurers to administer the Program.

(c)

Any contract entered into pursuant to this section shall require annual reporting of clinical-quality measurements and utilization data to the Mayor.

Aug. 16, 2008, D.C. Law 17-219, § 5045, 55 DCR 7598
Feb. 4, 2010, D.C. Law 18-104, § 3(c), 56 DCR 9182
D.C. Law 18-104, in subsec. (a), substituted “January 1, 2010” for “July 1, 2009”.
Section 3(c) of D.C. Law 18-134, in subsec. (a), substituted “January 1,2010” for “July 1, 2009”.
Section 6(b) of D.C. Law 18-134 provided that the act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.
Section 2(d) of D.C. Law 18-270 added subsec. (d) to read as follows: “(d) The Mayor is authorized to provide premium subsidies to qualified eligible individuals.”.
Section 4(b) of D.C. Law 18-270 provided that the act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 201(b) of Fiscal Year 2009 Balanced Budget Support Emergency Amendment Act of 2008 (D.C. Act 17-572, December 2, 2008, 55 DCR 12452).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 201(b) of Fiscal Year 2009 Balanced Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-13, February 23, 2009, 56 DCR 1920).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 3(c) of Hospital and Medical Services Corporation Regulatory Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-277, January 11, 2010, 57 DCR 935).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2(d) of Healthy DC Emergency Amendment Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-528, August 3, 2010, 57 DCR 8095).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2(d) of Healthy DC Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-569, October 19, 2010, 57 DCR 10082).